District of Columbia statutes.
2-218.33

Disadvantaged business enterprises.

(a)

A business enterprise shall be eligible for certification as a disadvantaged business enterprise if the business enterprise is:

(1)

Owned, operated, and controlled by economically disadvantaged individuals; and

(2)

(A)

Is a local business enterprise; or

(B)

Repealed.

(b)

A business enterprise that is affiliated with another business enterprise through common ownership, management, or control shall be eligible for certification as a disadvantaged business enterprise if:

(1)

The business enterprise seeking certification as a disadvantaged business enterprise is a local business enterprise;

(2)

In the event of a parent-subsidiary affiliation, both enterprises meet the requirements of subsection (a) of this section; and

(3)

The business enterprise has annualized gross receipts not exceeding limits as enumerated in rules issued pursuant to § 2-218.72.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2333, 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 2132(c), 53 DCR 6899
Apr. 20, 2010, D.C. Law 18-141, § 2(f), 57 DCR 1485
June 10, 2014, D.C. Law 20-108, § 2(k), 61 DCR 3892
This section is referenced in § 2-218.02.
D.C. Law 16-192 repealed subsec. (a)(2)(B); and, in subsec. (b)(1), deleted “or a qualified metropolitan area business enterprise” following “local business enterprise”. Prior to repeal, subsec. (a)(2)(B) read as follows: “(B) Is a qualified metropolitan area business enterprise;”
D.C. Law 18-141, in subsec. (b), deleted “and” from the end of par. (1); substituted “; and” for a period at the end of par. (2), and added par. (3).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-108 substituted “has annualized gross receipts not exceeding limits as enumerated in rules issued pursuant to § 2-218.72” for “has an average annualized gross receipts totaling $75 million or less” in (b)(3).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2333 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(c) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(c) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2132(c) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 20-108, § 4(c), see § 7005 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-108:

Section 4(a) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that applications pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be subject to the provisions of the act.

Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that, except as provided in § 2-218.46(f), contracts existing or pending as of June 10, 2014, shall not be affected by the provisions of the act.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 4(c) of D.C. Law 20-108 was repealed by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7005.